fst/example/english/english.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
Verb ;

LEXICON Noun

cat   Ninf;
city  Ninf;
watch Ninf;
try   Ninf;
panic Ninf;
fox   Ninf;

LEXICON Verb

fox   Vinf;
beg   Vinf;
make  Vinf;
watch Vinf;
try   Vinf;
panic Vinf;

LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:0   #;
+N+Pl:^s  #;

LEXICON Vinf

+V:0             #;
+V+3P+Sg:^s      #;
+V+Past:^ed      #;
+V+PastPart:^ed  #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;
